Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2624YC (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.102, subsection 1, paragraphs a and 1 c, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. After a dispositional hearing, the court may enter an 3 order transferring the legal custody of the child to a parent 4 of the child. If the court finds that custody with either 5 of the childâs parents is not in the childâs best interests, 6 the childâs custody shall be transferred to the department for 7 placement of the child in any of the following categories in 8 the following order of priority: 9 (1) An individual licensee under chapter 237 who has 10 provided child foster care to the child for at least nine 11 months immediately preceding the date of the dispositional 12 hearing. 13 (1) (2) An adult relative of the child including but not 14 limited to adult siblings and parents of siblings. 15 (2) (3) A fictive kin. 16 (3) (4) Any other suitable placement identified by the 17 childâs relatives. 18 (4) (5) An individual licensed to provide foster care 19 pursuant to chapter 237 . If the child is placed with a 20 licensed foster care provider, the department shall assign 21 decision-making authority to the foster care provider for the 22 purpose of applying the reasonable and prudent parent standard 23 during the childâs placement. 24 (5) (6) A group care facility, shelter care facility, or 25 other residential treatment facility. 26 c. A court shall not order placement of a child in a 27 category identified listed in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), 28 (3), (4), or (5) , or (6), without a specific finding that 29 placement with an adult relative is not in the childâs best 30 interests and providing reasons for the courtâs finding. 31 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 32 PROTECTIVE SERVICES ââ 30 DAYS TO FAMILY. 33 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 34 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 35 -1- LSB 2624YC (4) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 1 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 2 used for the purposes designated: 3 To employ five individuals with the department to perform 4 child protective services duties: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 275,000 6 2. The department of health and human services shall assign 7 each individual employed through the appropriation under 8 subsection 1 to a separate child protective services service 9 area. Each employee shall be responsible for performing the 10 identification and notice duties required under section 232.84 11 for the service area to which the employee was assigned. Each 12 employee shall implement practices described in the 30 days 13 to family model to the greatest extent practicable while 14 performing the employeeâs duties. 15